Wyoming, session 2025, SF0040.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-603(a) is amended to read:

15-1-603. Regulations; protest makes change
ineffective; exception; hearing and notice.

(a) If there is a protest against a change in the
regulations, restrictions or district boundaries signed by
the owners of twenty percent (20%) who can demonstrate a
concrete and particularized harm and who either own fifty
percent (50%) or more of the area of the lots included in
SF0040

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0085
the proposed change, or of those comprise fifty percent
(50%) or more of the owners immediately adjacent within a
distance of one hundred forty (140) five hundred (500)
feet, the change is not effective except upon the
affirmative vote of three-fourths (3/4) a majority of all
the members of the governing body. In determining the one
hundred forty (140) five hundred (500) feet, the width of
any intervening street or alley shall not be included.

Section 2. This act shall apply to protests filed on
and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0040